Maryland, session 2026, HB1434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. CAREGIVER RESOURCE WEBPAGE.
20–2501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) “CAREGIVER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES CARE,
SUPERVISION, OR ASSISTANCE TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL DUE TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S
AGE, DISABILITY, CHRONIC ILLNESS, COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR OTHER
FUNCTIONAL LIMITATION;
(2) “CAREGIVER” INCLUDES:
(I) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD WITH A DISABILITY,
CHRONIC ILLNESS, COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR OTHER FUNCTIONAL LIMITATION;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL CARING FOR AN ADULT FAMILY MEMBER OR
LOVED ONE WITH A DISABILITY, CHRONIC ILLNESS, COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR
OTHER FUNCTIONAL LIMITATION; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 873 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) A MINOR OR DEPENDENT PROVIDING CARE TO A PARENT,
GRANDPARENT, OR OTHER ADULT DUE TO THE AGE, DISABILITY, CHRONIC ILLNESS,
COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR OTHER FUNCTIONAL LIMITATION OF THE PARENT,
GRANDPARENT, OR OTHER ADULT; AND
(3) “CAREGIVER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PARENT OR GUARDIAN
PROVIDING CARE, SUPERVISION, OR ASSISTANCE TO A CHILD THAT DOES NOT HAVE
A DISABILITY, CHRONIC ILLNESS, COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT, OR OTHER FUNCTIONAL
LIMITATION.
20–2502.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A CENTRALIZED
CAREGIVER RESOURCE WEBPAGE FOR CAREGIVERS IN THE STATE.
(B) THE CAREGIVER RESOURCE WEBPAGE SHALL:
(1) BE POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE; AND
(2) PROVIDE PLAIN–LANGUAGE, EASILY ACCESSIBLE INFORMATION
TO SUPPORT ALL TYPES OF CAREGIVERS AT DIFFERENT STAGES OF CAREGIVING.
(C) THE CAREGIVER RESOURCE WEBPAGE SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION
AND LINKS TO RESOURCES RELATED TO:
(1) CAREGIVING FOR:
(I) CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES AND SPECIAL HEALTH CARE
NEEDS, INCLUDING EDUCATIONAL AND SCHOOL–BASED SUPPORTS;
(II) ADULTS WITH DISABILITIES, CHRONIC ILLNESS, OR
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH NEEDS; AND
(III) OLDER ADULTS, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS WITH DEMENTIA
OR COGNITIVE IMPAIRMENT;
(2) CAREGIVER HEALTH, WELLNESS, AND RESPITE RESOURCES;
(3) STATE AND LOCAL PROGRAMS THAT MAY PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE, TRAINING, OR SUPPORT TO CAREGIVERS;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 873
(4) SAFETY PLANNING, INCLUDING WANDERING AND ELOPEMENT
RISKS; AND
(5) PRIVACY, DATA MINIMIZATION, AND DATA SECURITY
CONSIDERATIONS WHEN TECHNOLOGY IS USED TO SUPPORT CAREGIVING OR
SAFETY.
(D) IN DEVELOPING THE WEBPAGE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COORDINATE WITH:
(1) THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING;
(3) THE DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES ADMINISTRATION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER RELEVANT STATE OR LOCAL AGENCIES.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW AND UPDATE THE WEBPAGE AS
NECESSARY, BUT NOT LESS THAN ANNUALLY.
20–2503.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE DEPARTMENT, ANY
STATE OR LOCAL AGENCY, OR ANY OTHER PERSON DESCRIBED, LISTED, OR LINKED
TO ON THE CAREGIVERS RESOURCE WEBPAGE TO PROVIDE OR FUND A SPECIFIC
SERVICE, DEVICE, RESOURCE, OR PROGRAM DESCRIBED, LISTED, OR LINKED TO ON
THE CAREGIVERS RESOURCE WEBPAGE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 31, 2026.
– 3 –